Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 7 Organization of Electric Membership Corporations

46-3-320.
Number of incorporators; age requirement.

One or more persons may act as incorporator or incorporators of an electric membership corporation to be formed under this article. Any natural person acting as incorporator shall be at least 18 years of age.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 5; Ga. L. 1980, p. 72, § 2; Code 1933, § 34C-701, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-321.
Signing of articles of incorporation; contents of articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation shall be signed by the incorporator or incorporators or his or their attorney and shall set forth:

The name of the electric membership corporation;

That the electric membership corporation is organized pursuant to this article;

The period of duration, which shall be perpetual unless otherwise limited;

The purpose or purposes for which the electric membership corporation is organized;

The address of its initial registered office and the name of its initial registered agent at such address;

The number of directors constituting the initial board of directors and the name and address of each person who is to serve as a member thereof; and

The name and address of each incorporator.

The articles of incorporation may, as a matter of election, also set forth:

Any provision, not inconsistent with law, for the regulation of the internal affairs of the electric membership corporation;

Any provision which under this chapter is required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws; any such provision set forth in the articles of incorporation need not be set forth in the bylaws; and

A provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director to the electric membership corporation or its members for monetary damages for breach of duty of care or other duty as a director, provided that such provision shall not eliminate or limit the liability of a director:

For any appropriation, in violation of his duties, of any business opportunity of the electric membership corporation;

For acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law; or

For any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit.

No such provision shall eliminate or limit the liability of a director for any act or omission occurring prior to the date when such provision becomes effective.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 6; Ga. L. 1980, p. 72, § 3; Code 1933, § 34C-702, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1451, § 3.

46-3-322.
Filing articles of incorporation; issuance of certificate of incorporation; forwarding of copy of certificate to clerk of superior court; rejection of articles of incorporation; publication of notice; commencement of corporate existence.

The incorporator or incorporators or his or their representative shall obtain from the Secretary of State a certificate which states that the name of the proposed electric membership corporation is available in accordance with Code Section 46-3-220. Such certificate shall be issued upon application to reserve the use of the proposed corporate name as provided in Code Section 46-3-221 and shall be valid for the period provided in Code Section 46-3-221, including any extension of such period granted by the Secretary of State. Upon the expiration of such period or any extension thereof, the certificate shall become void unless the electric membership corporation shall have come into existence within such time.

The incorporator or incorporators or his or their representative shall deliver the original articles of incorporation and two conformed copies of the articles to the Secretary of State for filing as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-174.

Together with the articles of incorporation, the incorporator or incorporators or his or their representative shall deliver to the Secretary of State:

A certificate issued by the Secretary of State reserving the name of the proposed electric membership corporation, as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section;

Payment to the Secretary of State of the fee provided for in Code Section 46-3-501;

A check, draft, or money order in the amount of $16.00, payable to the clerk of the superior court of the county where the initial registered office of the electric membership corporation is to be located, in payment of the cost of filing the articles of incorporation in that county and in payment of the fee required in civil actions and proceedings as required by Code Sections 15-6-77 and 47-14-51;

A letter addressed to the publisher of a newspaper which is the official organ of the county where the initial registered office of the electric membership corporation is to be located or which is a newspaper of general circulation published within that county whose most recently published annual statement of ownership and circulation reflects a minimum of 60 percent paid circulation. This letter shall contain a notice to be published four times in the newspaper and shall be in substantially the following form:

Click to view

A check, draft, or money order in the amount of $60.00, payable to the designated newspaper; and

A consent to appointment as registered agent, as provided for in subsection (c) of Code Section 46-3-240.

Upon delivery of the articles of incorporation to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall affix thereon the hour, day, month, and year of delivery. Not later than the close of business on the first business day following the day of delivery, the Secretary of State shall either issue a certificate of incorporation in the manner provided in this Code section or shall reject the articles in the manner provided in this Code section.

If the Secretary of State finds that the articles of incorporation appear to be in proper form for filing and are accompanied by the other items required by subsection (c) of this Code section, he shall, in addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-174:

Issue a certificate of incorporation in substantially the following form and attach it to one conformed copy of the articles of incorporation:

Click to view

Return the certificate of incorporation with the conformed copy of the articles of incorporation attached thereto to the incorporator or incorporators or his or their representative. A copy of the certificate of incorporation shall be attached to the original articles of incorporation;

Forward a conformed copy of the articles of incorporation with a copy of the certificate of incorporation attached thereto, along with the check, draft, or money order provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of this Code section, to the clerk of the superior court in the county where the initial registered office of the electric membership corporation is located, within four business days after the articles of incorporation have been delivered to the Secretary of State for filing;

Mail the letter and the check, draft, or money order provided for in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subsection (c) of this Code section, with the date of incorporation inserted in the notice, to the designated newspaper within four business days after the articles of incorporation have been delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

If the Secretary of State finds that the articles of incorporation do not appear to be in proper form for filing or are not accompanied by the other items required by subsection (c) of this Code section, he shall reject the articles for filing and shall immediately notify the incorporator or incorporators or his or their representative of such rejection by mailing a notice no later than the close of business on the first business day following the day of delivery of the articles of incorporation for filing. The notice shall specify the reason or reasons for rejection of the articles of incorporation; and the articles and all accompanying materials shall be returned therewith.

The conformed copy of the articles of incorporation, with a copy of the certificate of incorporation attached thereto, provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (e) of this Code section shall be filed upon receipt by the clerk of the superior court of the county where the initial registered office of the electric membership corporation is to be located. Failure on the part of the Secretary of State to mail the conformed copy of the articles of incorporation or failure on the part of the clerk of the superior court to comply with this subsection shall not invalidate the issuance of the certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State.

The notice provided for in paragraph (4) of subsection (c) of this Code section shall be published within ten days after receipt of the notice by the newspaper. Failure on the part of the Secretary of State to mail the notice or failure on the part of the newspaper to comply with this subsection shall not invalidate the issuance of the certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State.

If the Secretary of State issues a certificate of incorporation, the corporate existence of the electric membership corporation shall begin as of the time of delivery to the Secretary of State of the articles of incorporation so certified.

(name and address of the newspaper designated by the incorporator or incorporators or his or their representative) Dear Sirs: You are requested to publish, four times, a notice in the following form: “ (name of electric membership corporation) has been duly incorporated on (month, day, and year to be inserted by the Secretary of State), by the issuance of a certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State in accordance with the applicable provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 3 of Title 46, the ‘Georgia Electric Membership Corporation Act.’ The initial registered office of the electric membership corporation is located at (address of registered office) and its initial registered agent at such address is (name of agent).” Enclosed is a (check, draft, or money order) in the amount of $60.00 in payment of the costs of publishing this notice. Very truly yours, (Name and address of incorporator or incorporators or his or their representative)

State of Georgia Office of the Secretary of State Ex Officio Corporation Commissioner This is to certify that (the name of the electric membership corporation) has been duly incorporated under the laws of the State of Georgia on the day of , (insert date articles of incorporation are delivered for filing), by the filing of articles of incorporation in the office of the Secretary of State and the fees therefor paid, as provided by law, and that attached hereto is a true copy of the said articles of incorporation. Witness my hand and official seal, this day of , . Secretary of State Ex Officio Corporation Commissioner of the State of Georgia

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 8; Ga. L. 1980, p. 72, § 4; Code 1933, § 34C-703, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 46; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 46.

46-3-323.
Effect of issuance of certificate of incorporation.

The certificate of incorporation issued by the Secretary of State shall be conclusive evidence that the electric membership corporation has been incorporated under this article, except as against this state in a proceeding to cancel or revoke the certificate of incorporation or for involuntary dissolution of the electric membership corporation.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-704, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 46.

46-3-324.
Organization meeting of directors.

After the corporate existence has begun, an organization meeting of the board of directors named in the articles of incorporation shall be held, either within or outside of this state, at the call of any incorporator, for the purpose of adopting bylaws, electing officers, and transacting such other business as properly may come before the meeting. The incorporator or incorporators calling the meeting shall give at least three days’ notice thereof by mail to each director so named, which notice shall state the time and place of the meeting.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-705, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-325.
Adoption of initial bylaws; authority to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt new bylaws; contents of bylaws generally.

The initial bylaws of an electric membership corporation shall be adopted by its board of directors.

The board of directors shall not have power to alter, amend, or repeal the bylaws or adopt new bylaws directly relating to the election of the board of directors. The board of directors shall otherwise have power to alter, amend, or repeal the bylaws or adopt new bylaws unless such power is reserved exclusively to the members by the articles of incorporation or in bylaws previously adopted by the members; but any bylaws adopted by the board of directors may be altered, amended, or repealed and new bylaws adopted by the members. The members may prescribe that any bylaw or bylaws adopted by them shall not be altered, amended, or repealed by the board of directors.

The bylaws may contain any provisions for the regulation and management of the affairs of the electric membership corporation not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 12; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 359, § 1; Code 1933, § 34C-706, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-326.
Adoption of bylaws for emergency conditions; emergency powers of board of directors generally.

The board of directors may adopt emergency bylaws, subject to repeal or change by action of the members, which, notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in this article or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, shall be operative during any emergency in the conduct of the business of the electric membership corporation resulting from an attack on the United States or on a locality in which the electric membership corporation conducts its business or customarily holds meetings of its board of directors or its members, or during any nuclear or atomic disaster, or during the existence of any catastrophe or other similar emergency condition, as a result of which a quorum of the board of directors or a standing committee thereof cannot readily be convened for action. The emergency bylaws may make any provision that may be practical and necessary for the circumstances of the emergency, including, without limitation, provisions that:

A meeting of the board of directors may be called by any officer or director in such manner and under such conditions as shall be prescribed in the emergency bylaws;

The director or directors in attendance at the meeting, or any greater number fixed by the emergency bylaws, shall constitute a quorum;

The officers or other persons designated on a list approved by the board of directors before the emergency, all in such order or priority and subject to such conditions and for such period of time (not longer than reasonably necessary after the termination of the emergency) as may be provided in the emergency bylaws or in the resolution approving the list, shall, to the extent required to provide a quorum at any meeting of the board of directors, be deemed directors for such meeting;

Any officer of the electric membership corporation shall have such emergency powers as may be prescribed in the emergency bylaws; and

The board of directors may delegate any of its powers to any officer or director.

The board of directors, either before or during any such emergency, may provide and from time to time may modify lines of succession in the event that during such an emergency any or all officers or agents of the electric membership corporation shall for any reason be rendered incapable of discharging their duties.

The board of directors, either before or during any such emergency, may, effective during the emergency, change the head office or designate several alternative head offices or regional offices or authorize the officers so to do.

To the extent not inconsistent with any emergency bylaws so adopted, the bylaws of the electric membership corporation shall remain in effect during any such emergency; and upon the termination of the emergency, the emergency bylaws shall cease to be operative.

Unless otherwise provided in the emergency bylaws, notice of any meeting of the board of directors during any such emergency may be given only to such of the directors as it may be feasible to reach at the time and by such means as may be feasible at the time, including publication, radio, or television.

To the extent required to constitute a quorum at any meeting of the board of directors during any such emergency, the officers of the electric membership corporation who are present, unless otherwise provided in the emergency bylaws, shall be deemed, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, directors for such meeting.

No officer, director, agent, or employee acting in accordance with any emergency bylaws shall be liable except for willful misconduct. No officer, director, agent, or employee shall be liable for any action taken by him in good faith in such an emergency in furtherance of the ordinary business affairs of the electric membership corporation, even though such action is not authorized by the bylaws then in effect.

If emergency bylaws have not been adopted by an electric membership corporation, action by members, directors, officers, agents, or employees during any emergency described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be valid if it is substantially in compliance with this Code section or if it is otherwise practical and necessary for the emergency operation and management of the business.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-707, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.